California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an inmate who is released on parole or postrelease community supervision as provided by Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) shall be returned to the county that was the last legal residence of the inmate prior to the inmate’s incarceration. An inmate who is released on parole or postrelease community supervision as provided by Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) and who was committed to prison for a sex offense for which registration is required pursuant to Section 290, shall, through all efforts reasonably possible, be returned to the city that was the last legal residence of the inmate prior to incarceration or a close geographic location in which the inmate has family, social ties, or economic ties and access to reentry services, unless return to that location
 would violate any other law or pose a risk to the inmate’s victim. For purposes of this subdivision, “last legal residence” shall not be construed to mean the county or city wherein the inmate committed an offense while confined in a state prison or local jail facility or while confined for treatment in a state hospital.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an inmate may be returned to another county or city if that would be in the best interests of the public. When setting conditions of parole, if the Board of Parole
 Hearings, upon granting parole to a person, or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation decides on a return to another county or city, it shall place its reasons in writing in the parolee’s permanent record and the reasons shall be included in the notice to the sheriff or chief of police pursuant to Section 3058.6. In making its decision, the paroling authority shall consider, among others, the following factors, giving the greatest weight to the protection of the victim and the safety of the community:

(1) The need to
 protect the life or safety of a victim, the parolee, a witness, or any other person.

(2) Public concern that would reduce the chance that the inmate’s parole would be successfully completed.

(3) The verified existence of a work offer, or an educational or vocational training program chosen by the inmate in another county.

(4) The existence of family in another county with whom the inmate has maintained strong ties and whose support would increase the chance that the inmate’s parole would be successfully completed.

(5) The lack of necessary outpatient treatment programs for parolees receiving treatment pursuant to Section 2960 in the county of last legal residence.

(6) The existence of a
 housing option in another county, including with a relative or acceptance into a transitional housing program of choice.

(c) (1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in determining an out-of-county commitment pursuant to this section, shall give priority to the safety of the community and any witnesses and victims.

(2) Absent evidence that parole transfer would present a threat to public safety, the inmate shall be released to the county in the location of a verified existence of a postsecondary educational or vocational training program of the inmate’s choice, or of a verified existence of a work offer, the inmate’s family, outpatient treatment, or housing. The burden of verifying the existence of an educational or vocational training program or a work offer shall be on the person on parole. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall
 complete the parole transfer process prior to release and ensure the person is released from prison directly to the county where the postsecondary educational or vocational training program chosen by the inmate, or the work offer, the inmate’s family, outpatient treatment, or housing is located. This paragraph shall not apply to placement and participation in a transitional housing program during the first year after release pursuant to a condition of parole imposed by the Board of Parole Hearings upon granting parole at a hearing conducted under Article 3 (commencing with Section 3040).

(3) Absent evidence that travel outside of the county of commitment would present a threat to public safety, a person on parole shall be granted a permit to travel outside the county of commitment to a location where the person has postsecondary educational or vocational training program opportunities, including classes, conferences, or extracurricular
 educational activities, an employment opportunity, or inpatient or outpatient treatment. A parole agent shall provide a written response of their decision within 14 days after receiving the request for a travel permit. If the parole agent denies the request for an out-of-county travel permit, they shall include in writing the reasons the travel would present a threat to public safety.

(4) Absent evidence that transfer to a county outside the county of commitment would present a threat to public safety, a person on parole shall be granted approval of an application to transfer residency and parole to another county where the person has a verified existence of a postsecondary educational or vocational training program chosen by the inmate, or a verified existence of a work offer, the person’s family, inpatient or outpatient treatment, or housing. The burden of verifying the existence of an educational or vocational training program or a work
 offer shall be on the person on parole. A parole agent shall provide a written response of their decision within 14 days after receiving the request for the transfer application. If the parole agent denies the application for a transfer of parole to another county, they shall include in writing the reasons the transfer would present a threat to public safety. This paragraph shall not apply to placement and participation in a transitional housing program during the first year after release pursuant to a condition of parole imposed by the Board of Parole Hearings upon granting parole at a hearing conducted under Article 3 (commencing with Section 3040).

(5) The department and probation officers may extend paragraphs (2) through (4), inclusive, to individuals released on postrelease community supervision. The Legislature finds and declares that the department and probation officers are strongly encouraged to apply this paragraph to individuals
 released on postrelease community supervision.

(d) In making its decision about an inmate who participated in a joint venture program pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2717.1) of Chapter 5, the paroling authority shall release the inmate to the county where the joint venture program employer is located if that employer states to the paroling authority that the employer intends to employ the inmate upon release.

(e) (1) The following information, if available, shall be released by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to local law enforcement agencies regarding a paroled inmate or inmate placed on postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) who is released in their jurisdictions:

(A) Last, first, and middle names.

(B) Birth date.

(C) Sex, race, height, weight, and hair and eye color.

(D) Date of parole or placement on postrelease community supervision and discharge.

(E) Registration status, if the inmate is required to register as a result of a controlled substance, sex, or arson offense.

(F) California Criminal Information Number, FBI number, social security number, and driver’s license number.

(G) County of commitment.

(H) A description of scars, marks, and tattoos on the inmate.

(I) Offense or offenses for
 which the inmate was convicted that resulted in parole or postrelease community supervision in this instance.

(J) Address, including all of the following information:

(i) Street name and number. Post office box numbers are not acceptable for purposes of this subparagraph.

(ii) City and ZIP Code.

(iii) Date that the address provided pursuant to this subparagraph was proposed to be effective.

(K) Contact officer and unit, including all of the following information:

(i) Name and telephone number of each contact officer.

(ii) Contact unit type of each contact
 officer such as units responsible for parole, registration, or county probation.

(L) A digitized image of the photograph and at least a single digit fingerprint of the parolee.

(M) A geographic coordinate for the inmate’s residence location for use with a Geographical Information System (GIS) or comparable computer program.

(2) Unless the information is unavailable, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall electronically transmit to the county agency identified in subdivision (a) of Section 3451 the inmate’s tuberculosis status, specific medical, mental health, and outpatient clinic needs, and any medical concerns or disabilities for the county to consider as the offender transitions onto postrelease community supervision pursuant to Section 3450, for the purpose of identifying the medical and mental
 health needs of the individual. All transmissions to the county agency shall be in compliance with applicable provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) (Public Law 104-191), the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (HITECH) (Public Law 111-005), and the implementing of privacy and security regulations in Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. This paragraph shall not take effect until the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or the secretary’s designee, determines that this provision is not preempted by HIPAA.

(3) Except for the information required by paragraph (2), the information required by this subdivision shall come from the statewide parolee database. The information obtained from each source shall be based on the same timeframe.

(4) All of the information required by this subdivision shall be provided utilizing a computer-to-computer transfer in a format usable by a desktop computer system. The transfer of this information shall be continually available to local law enforcement agencies upon request.

(5) The unauthorized release or receipt of the information described in this subdivision is a violation of Section 11143.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, if the victim or witness has requested additional distance in the placement of the inmate on parole, and if the Board of Parole Hearings or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation finds that there is a need to protect the life, safety, or well-being of the victim or witness, an inmate who is released on parole shall not be returned to a location within 35 miles of the actual residence of a victim of, or a witness to, any of the
 following crimes:

(1) A violent felony as defined in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, and paragraphs (11) and (16) of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(2) A felony in which the defendant inflicts great bodily injury on a person, other than an accomplice, that has been charged and proved as provided for in Section 12022.53, 12022.7, or 12022.9.

(3) A violation of paragraph (1), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, subdivision (f), (g), or (i) of Section 286, subdivision (f), (g), or (i) of Section 287 or of former Section 288a, or subdivision (b), (d), or (e) of Section 289.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, an inmate who is released on parole for a violation of Section 288 or 288.5 whom the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation
 determines poses a high risk to the public shall not be placed or reside, for the duration of the inmate’s parole, within one-half mile of a public or private school including any or all of kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, an inmate who is released on parole or postrelease community supervision for a stalking offense shall not be returned to a location within 35 miles of the victim’s or witness’ actual residence or place of employment if the victim or witness has requested additional distance in the placement of the inmate on parole or postrelease community supervision, and if the Board of Parole Hearings or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the supervising county agency, as applicable, finds that there is a need to protect the life, safety, or well-being of the victim. If an inmate who is released on postrelease community supervision cannot be placed in the inmate’s county of
 last legal residence in compliance with this subdivision, the supervising county agency may transfer the inmate to another county upon approval of the receiving county.

(i) The authority shall give consideration to the equitable distribution of parolees and the proportion of out-of-county commitments from a county compared to the number of commitments from that county when making parole decisions.

(j) An inmate may be paroled to another state pursuant to any other law. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall coordinate with local entities regarding the placement of inmates placed out of state on postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450).

(k) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall
 be the agency primarily responsible for, and shall have control over, the program, resources, and staff implementing the Law Enforcement Automated Data System (LEADS) in conformance with subdivision (e). County agencies supervising inmates released to postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) shall provide any information requested by the department to ensure the availability of accurate information regarding inmates released from state prison. This information may include the issuance of warrants, revocations, or the termination of postrelease community supervision. On or before August 1, 2011, county agencies designated to supervise inmates released to postrelease community supervision shall notify the department that the county agencies have been designated as the local entity responsible for providing that supervision.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall be the
 agency primarily responsible for the proper release of information under LEADS that relates to fingerprint cards.

(l) In addition to the requirements under subdivision (k), the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit to the Department of Justice data to be included in the supervised release file of the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) so that law enforcement can be advised through CLETS of all persons on postrelease community supervision and the county agency designated to provide supervision. The data required by this subdivision shall be provided via electronic transfer.

(m) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 826, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 10.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a person is released on parole after having served a term of imprisonment in state prison for any offense for which registration is required pursuant to Section 290, that person may not, during the period of parole, reside in any single family dwelling with any other person also required to register pursuant to Section 290, unless those persons are legally related by blood, marriage, or adoption. For purposes of this section, “single family dwelling” shall not include a residential facility which serves six or fewer persons.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is unlawful for any person for whom registration is required pursuant to Section 290 to reside within 2000 feet of any public or private school, or park where children regularly gather.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit municipal jurisdictions from enacting local ordinances that further restrict the residency of any person for whom registration is required pursuant to Section 290.

(History: Amended November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 83, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.6.

(a) Every person who is required to register pursuant to Section 290, based upon the commission of an offense against a minor, is prohibited from residing, except as a client, and from working or volunteering in any of the following:

(1) A child day care facility or children’s residential facility that is licensed by the State Department of Social Services, a home certified by a foster family agency, or a home approved by a county child welfare services agency.

(2) A home or facility that receives a placement of a child who has been, or may be, declared a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code or who has been, or may be, declared a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the State Department of Social Services to deny a criminal record exemption request and to take an action to exclude an individual from residing, working, or volunteering in a licensed facility pursuant to Sections 1522, 1569.09, 1569.17, or 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 772, Sec. 1.   (AB 1108)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Parole Hearings, the court, or the supervising parole authority may require, as a condition of release on parole or reinstatement on parole, or as an intermediate sanction in lieu of return to custody, that an inmate or parolee agree in writing to the use of electronic monitoring or supervising devices for the purpose of helping to verify his or her compliance with all other conditions of parole. The devices shall not be used to eavesdrop or record any conversation, except a conversation between the parolee and the agent supervising the parolee which is to be used solely for the purposes of voice identification.

(b) Every inmate who has
 been convicted for any felony violation of a “registerable sex offense” described in subdivision (c) of Section 290 or any attempt to commit any of the above-mentioned offenses and who is committed to prison and released on parole pursuant to Section 3000 or 3000.1 shall be monitored by a global positioning system for life.

(c) Any inmate released on parole pursuant to this section shall be required to pay for the costs associated with the monitoring by a global positioning system. However, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall waive any or all of that payment upon a finding of an inability to pay. The department shall consider any remaining amounts the inmate has been ordered to pay in fines, assessments and restitution fines, fees, and orders, and shall give priority to the payment of those items before requiring that the inmate pay for the global positioning monitoring.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 39.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

3006.

(a) The Department of Corrections may require parolees participating in relapse prevention treatment programs or receiving medication treatments intended to prevent them from committing sex offenses to pay some or all of the costs associated with this treatment, subject to the person’s ability to pay.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “ability to pay” means the overall capability of the person to reimburse the costs, or a portion of the costs, of providing sex offender treatment, and shall include, but shall not be limited to, consideration of all of the following factors:

(1) Present financial position.

(2) Reasonably discernible future financial position.

(3) Likelihood that the person shall be able to obtain employment after the date of parole.

(4) Any other factor or factors which may bear upon the person’s financial capability to reimburse the department for the costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 127, Sec. 28.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3007.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall require a research component for any sex offender treatment contract funded by the department. The research component shall enable the department’s research unit or an independent contractor to evaluate the effectiveness of each contract on reducing the rate of recidivism of the participants in the program funded by a contract. The research findings shall be compiled annually in a report due to the Legislature January 10 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 8.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3007.05.

(a) (1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall ensure that an eligible inmate, as defined under subdivision (b), released from a state prison has a valid identification card, issued pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of Chapter 1 of Division 6 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) To the extent administratively feasible and within available resources, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall facilitate the process between the inmate and the agencies holding documentation required for an inmate identified under subdivision (b) to obtain a California identification card, such as a birth certificate
 or social security number, including, but not limited to, the provision of any necessary notary services, assistance with obtaining necessary forms, and correspondence.

(b) For purposes of this section, “eligible inmate” means an inmate who is applying for an original or replacement identification card and meets all of the requirements described under subdivision (c) or (d).

(c) (1) The inmate has previously held a California driver’s license or identification card.

(2) (A) The inmate has a usable photo on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(B) If the photo is deemed unusable, the inmate shall have a new
 photo taken.

(3) The inmate has provided, and the Department of Motor Vehicles has verified, all of the following information:

(A) The inmate’s true full name.

(B) The inmate’s date of birth.

(C) The inmate’s social security number.

(D) The inmate’s legal presence in the United States or, upon implementation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code, if the inmate is unable to submit satisfactory proof that their presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, the inmate has provided proof of their identity pursuant to Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle
 Code.

(E) California residency.

(d) (1) The inmate has not previously held a California driver’s license or identification card.

(2) The inmate has signed and verified their application for an identification card under the penalty of perjury.

(3) The inmate has a usable photo taken.

(4) The inmate has provided a legible print of their thumb or finger.

(5) The inmate has provided acceptable proof of the information described under subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), and that
 information is subject to verification by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(e) The fee for an original or replacement identification card issued to an eligible inmate pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the fee set forth under subdivision (h) of Section 14902 of the Vehicle Code.

(f) (1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and Department of Motor Vehicles may provide a renewed driver’s license in lieu of an identification card if the inmate meets the eligibility criteria specified in Section 12814.5 of the Vehicle Code and is otherwise eligible for the issuance of a driver’s license. An inmate receiving a driver’s license shall be responsible for paying the difference between the cost of the driver’s license and the reduced fee
 for a California identification card.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to an inmate whose driving privilege was valid within the prior 10 years.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as removing the examination discretion of the Department of Motor Vehicles under Section 12814 of the Vehicle Code.

(g) If a valid California identification card is not obtained before release, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide the inmate with a photo prison identification card. It is the intent of the Legislature that as many inmates as possible be provided with a valid California identification card or driver’s license.

(h) The
 Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall assist a person who is exonerated as to a conviction for which the person is serving a state prison sentence at the time of exoneration with all of the following:

(1) Transitional services, including housing assistance, job training, and mental health services, as applicable. The services shall be offered within the first week of an individual’s exoneration and again within the first 30 days of exoneration. Services shall be provided for a period of not less than six months and not more than one year from the date of release unless the exonerated person qualifies for services beyond one year under existing law.

(2) Enrollment in the Medi-Cal program established pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division
 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) (A) Enrollment in the CalFresh program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) Exonerated persons who are ineligible for CalFresh benefits pursuant to the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program limitation specified in Section 2015(o) of Title 7 of the United States Code shall be given priority for receipt of the 15-percent exemption specified in Section 2015(o)(6) of Title 7 of the United States Code. The State Department of Social Services shall issue guidance to counties regarding that requirement.

(4) Referral to the Employment Development Department and applicable
 regional planning units for workforce services.

(5) Enrollment in the federal Supplemental Security Income benefits program pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.) and state supplemental program pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(i) (1) In addition to any other payment to which the person is entitled to by law, a person who is exonerated shall be paid the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon release, from funds to be made available upon appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose.

(2) In addition to any other
 payment to which the person is entitled to by law, a person who is exonerated shall be paid the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon release, to be used for housing, including, but not limited to, hotel costs, mortgage expenses, a downpayment, security deposit, or any payment necessary to secure and maintain rental housing or other housing accommodations. The exonerated person shall also be entitled to receive direct payment or reimbursement for reasonable housing costs for a period of not more than four years following release from custody. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall disburse payments or reimbursements pursuant to this paragraph from funds to be made available upon appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose.

(3) As used in paragraph (2), the term “reasonable housing costs” means all of the
 following:

(A) For hotel costs, the cost of lodging, not to exceed 25 percent above the federal General Services Administration’s per diem lodging reimbursement rate.

(B) For payments necessary to secure and maintain rental housing, both of the following:

(i) The actual cost of any security deposits necessary to secure a rental housing unit.

(ii) The cost of rent, not to exceed 25 percent above the fair market value as defined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(C) For mortgage expenses, the cost of mortgage payments, not to exceed 25 percent above the Federal
 Housing Administration’s area loan limits.

(j) For the purposes of this section, “exonerated” means the person has been convicted and subsequently one of the following occurred:

(1) A writ of habeas corpus concerning the person was granted on the basis that the evidence unerringly points to innocence, or the person’s conviction was reversed on appeal on the basis of insufficient evidence.

(2) A writ of habeas corpus concerning the person was granted pursuant to Section 1473, either resulting in dismissal of the criminal charges for which the person was incarcerated or following a determination that the person is entitled to release on the person’s own recognizance, or to bail, pending retrial or pending
 appeal.

(3) The person was given an absolute pardon by the Governor on the basis that the person was innocent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 4.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3007.08.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall ensure that an eligible juvenile offender released from a state juvenile facility has a valid identification card, issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 12800) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of Chapter 1 of Division 6 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) The fee for an identification card issued pursuant to this section is eight dollars ($8). An eligible juvenile offender shall provide the Department of Motor Vehicles, upon application, with a verification of his or her eligibility that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is
 on state juvenile correctional facility letterhead.

(2) Is typed or computer generated.

(3) Contains the juvenile offender’s name.

(4) Contains the juvenile offender’s date of birth.

(5) Contains the original signature of an official from the state juvenile correctional facility.

(6) Is dated within 90 days of the application.

(c) The verification required by subdivision (b) may be used to attest to an applicant’s residency in a facility operated by the department and shall be acceptable proof of California residency.

(d) (1) For purposes
 of this section, “eligible juvenile offender” means a juvenile offender who previously held a California driver’s license or identification card, issued pursuant to Section 12801.5 of Article 3 (commencing with Section 12800) of Chapter 1 of Division 6 of the Vehicle Code, or a juvenile offender who provides acceptable proof of his or her:

(A) True full name.

(B) Date of birth.

(C) Social security number.

(D) Legal presence in the United States.

(E) California residency.

(2) A certified copy of a birth certificate issued by the Office of Vital Records of the State Department of Public Health is acceptable proof to satisfy the
 requirements of subparagraphs (A), (B), and (D) of paragraph (1).

(e) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall enter into an interagency agreement to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 20.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3007.09.

The department shall, upon release, provide each inmate informational written materials, in a format prescribed by the department, regarding vocational rehabilitation services and independent living programs offered by the Department of Rehabilitation described in Division 10 (commencing with Section 19000) of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code, and an enrollment form for these vocational rehabilitation services. These documents shall be provided to any inmate being released, whether or not the department believes them to be eligible for these programs and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Intensive Parole Supervision of Sex Offenders [3008. - 3008.]

3008.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall ensure that all parolees under active supervision who are deemed to pose a high risk to the public of committing sex crimes, as determined by the State-Authorized Risk Assessment Tool for Sex Offenders (SARATSO), as set forth in Sections 290.04 to 290.06, inclusive, are placed on intensive and specialized parole supervision and are required to report frequently to designated parole officers. The department may place any other parolee convicted of an offense that requires him or her to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 who is on active supervision on intensive and specialized supervision and require him or her to report frequently to designated parole officers.

(b) The department shall develop and, at the discretion of the secretary, and subject to an appropriation of the necessary funds, may implement a plan for the implementation of relapse prevention treatment programs, and the provision of other services deemed necessary by the department, in conjunction with intensive and specialized parole supervision, to reduce the recidivism of sex offenders.

(c) The department shall develop control and containment programming for sex offenders who have been deemed to pose a high risk to the public of committing a sex crime, as determined by the SARATSO, and shall require participation in appropriate programming as a condition of parole.

(d) On or after July 1, 2012, the parole
 conditions of a person released on parole for an offense that requires registration pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.023, inclusive, shall include all of the following:

(1) Persons placed on parole prior to July 1, 2012, shall participate in an approved sex offender management program, following the standards developed pursuant to Section 9003, for a period of not less than one year or the remaining term of parole if it is less than one year. The length of the period in the program is to be determined by the certified sex offender management professional in consultation with the parole officer and as approved by the court. Participation in this program applies to each person without regard to when his or her crime or crimes were committed.

(2) Persons placed on parole on or after
 July 1, 2012, shall successfully complete a sex offender management program, following the standards developed pursuant to Section 9003, as a condition of parole. The length of the period in the program shall be not less than one year, up to the entire period of parole, as determined by the certified sex offender management professional in consultation with the parole officer and as approved by the court. Participation in this program applies to every person described without regard to when his or her crime or crimes were committed.

(3) Waiver of any privilege against self-incrimination and participation in polygraph examinations, which shall be part of the sex offender management program.

(4) Waiver of any psychotherapist-patient privilege to enable communication between the sex
 offender management professional and supervising parole officer, pursuant to Section 290.09.

(e) Any defendant ordered to be placed in an approved sex offender management treatment program pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be responsible for paying the expense of his or her participation in the program. The department shall take into consideration the ability of the defendant to pay, and no defendant shall be denied discharge onto parole because of his or her inability to pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 611, Sec. 2.   (AB 2411)   Effective September 26, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Electronic Monitoring [3010. - 3010.10.]

3010.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may utilize continuous electronic monitoring to electronically monitor the whereabouts of persons on parole, as provided by this article.

(b) Any use of continuous electronic monitoring pursuant to this article shall have as its primary objective the enhancement of public safety through the reduction in the number of people being victimized by crimes committed by persons on parole.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to specifically expand the authority of the department acting pursuant to this article to utilize a system of continuous electronic monitoring that conforms with the requirements of this article.

(d) (1) For purposes of this article, “continuous electronic monitoring” may include the use of worldwide radio navigation system technology, known as the Global Positioning System, or GPS. The Legislature finds that because of its capability for continuous surveillance, continuous electronic monitoring has been used in other parts of the country to monitor persons on parole who are identified as requiring a high level of supervision.

(2) For purposes of this article, “department” means the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(e) The Legislature finds that continuous electronic monitoring has proven to be an effective risk management tool for supervising high-risk persons on parole who are likely to reoffend where prevention and knowledge of their whereabouts is a high priority for maintaining public safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.1.

The department may utilize a continuous electronic monitoring device, as distinguished from an electronic monitoring device as described in Section 3004, pursuant to this section that has all of the following attributes:

(a) A device designed to be worn by a human being.

(b) A device that emits a signal as a person is moving or is stationary. The signal shall be capable of being received and tracked across large urban or rural areas, statewide, and being received from within structures, vehicles, and other objects to the degree technically feasible in light of the associated costs, design, and other considerations as are determined relevant by the department.

(c) A device that functions 24 hours a day.

(d) A device that is resistant or impervious to unintentional or willful damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.2.

(a) A continuous electronic monitoring system may have the capacity to immediately notify the department of violations, actual or suspected, of the terms of parole that have been identified by the monitoring system if the requirement is deemed necessary by the parole officer with respect to an individual person.

(b) This information, including geographic location and tampering, may be used as evidence to prove a violation of the terms of parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.3.

The department shall establish the following standards as are necessary to enhance public safety:
